District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.30

Awards paid by Treasurer of United States; benefits deducted from damages.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 716, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-320, 7-321.